Utah statutes.
78B-12-115.   Husband and wife privileged communication inapplicable --
Competency of spouses.
Laws attaching a privilege against the disclosure of communications between
husband and wife are inapplicable under this chapter.  Spouses are competent
witnesses to testify to any relevant matter, including marriage and parentage.
